Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1206.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XIII-FSCHOOL CHAPLAINSSection 1301-F. Scope of article.This article relates to school chaplains.Section 1302-F. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Certified school chaplain." An individual certified by the 12345678910111213141516171819 National School Chaplain Association or other similar organization."Public school entity." A school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school, cyber charter school or regional charter school.Section 1303-F. Certified school chaplains.(a) Authorization.--A public school entity may employ, or approve as a volunteer, a certified school chaplain to provide support, services and programs for students and employees as assigned by the governing body of the school if the certified school chaplain has satisfied the requirements under sections 111 and 111.1 and 23 Pa.C.S. § 6344 (relating to e mployees having contact with children; adoptive and foster parents ) or 6344.2 (relating to v olunteers having contact with children ). (b) State certification not required.--A certified school chaplain employed or volunteering under this article is not required to be certified under Article XI.Section 1304-F. Duties of a public school entity.The governing board of a public school entity shall take a vote, no later than six months after the effective date of this section, on whether to adopt a policy authorizing the public school entity to employ, or approve as a volunteer, a certified school chaplain.Section 2. This amendatory act shall be known as the Student and Teacher Support Act.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1206PN1354 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526